District of Columbia statutes.
11-945

Oaths, affirmations, and acknowledgments.

Each judge and each employee of the Superior Court authorized by the chief judge may administer oaths and affirmations and take acknowledgments.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 487, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1981 Ed., § 11-945.
1973 Ed., § 11-945.